Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.036

Landlord-tenant proceedings.

When requested by the attorney general, the chief administrative law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to conduct proceedings under Title 59 RCW.

[ 2007 c 431 s 9.]

NOTES:

Implementation—2007 c 431: See note following RCW 59.30.010.